eu.aff
FLAG num
SFX 230 Y 534
SFX 230    0       a      .
SFX 230    0       ago/243      .
SFX 230    0       agoa/243      .
SFX 230    0       agoak/243      .
SFX 230    0       agoarekin/243      .
SFX 230    0       agoarendako/243      .
SFX 230    0       agoarentzat/243      .
SFX 230    0       agoaren/238      .
SFX 230    0       agoari/243      .
SFX 230    0       agoaz/243      .
SFX 230    0       agoei/243      .
SFX 230    0       agoek/243      .
SFX 230    0       agoekin/243      .
SFX 230    0       agoendako/243      .
SFX 230    0       agoentzat/243      .
SFX 230    0       agoez/243      .
SFX 230    0       agoen/238      .
SFX 230    0       agogatik/243      .
SFX 230    0       agooi/243      .
SFX 230    0       agook/243      .
SFX 230    0       agookin/243      .
SFX 230    0       agoontzat/243      .
SFX 230    0       agootaz/243      .
SFX 230    0       agooz/243      .
SFX 230    0       agoon/243      .
SFX 230    0       agotzat/243      .
SFX 230    0       agok/243      .
SFX 230    0       agoz/243      .
SFX 230    0       agorekin/243      .
SFX 230    0       agorendako/243      .
SFX 230    0       agorentzat/243      .
SFX 230    0       agoren/238      .
SFX 230    0       agori/243      .
SFX 230    0       agorik/243      .
SFX 230    0       agoan/243      .
SFX 230    0       agoko/243      .
SFX 230    0       agoraino/243      .
SFX 230    0       agorantz/243      .
SFX 230    0       agorat/243      .
SFX 230    0       agora/243      .
SFX 230    0       agotik/243      .
SFX 230    0       ak      .
SFX 230    0       arekin      .
SFX 230    0       arekiko/243      .
SFX 230    0       arendako/243      .
SFX 230    0       arentzat      .
SFX 230    0       arentzako/243      .
SFX 230    0       aren/238      .
SFX 230    0       arena      .
SFX 230    0       arenak      .
SFX 230    0       arenarekin      .
SFX 230    0       arenarendako/243      .
SFX 230    0       arenarentzat      .
SFX 230    0       arenari      .
SFX 230    0       arenaz      .
SFX 230    0       arenei      .
SFX 230    0       arenek      .
SFX 230    0       arenekin      .
SFX 230    0       arenendako/243      .
SFX 230    0       arenentzat      .
SFX 230    0       arenetaraino      .
SFX 230    0       arenetarantz      .
SFX 230    0       arenetarat      .
SFX 230    0       arenetara      .
SFX 230    0       arenetatik      .
SFX 230    0       arenetan      .
SFX 230    0       arenetarik      .
SFX 230    0       arenez      .
SFX 230    0       arengan      .
SFX 230    0       arengana      .
SFX 230    0       arenganaino      .
SFX 230    0       arenganantz      .
SFX 230    0       arengandik      .
SFX 230    0       arengatik      .
SFX 230    0       arenoi      .
SFX 230    0       arenok      .
SFX 230    0       arenokin      .
SFX 230    0       arenontzat      .
SFX 230    0       arenotaz      .
SFX 230    0       arenoz      .
SFX 230    0       areni      .
SFX 230    0       arenik      .
SFX 230    0       arenean      .
SFX 230    0       areneraino      .
SFX 230    0       arenerantz      .
SFX 230    0       arenerat      .
SFX 230    0       arenera      .
SFX 230    0       arenetik      .
SFX 230    0       ari      .
SFX 230    0       az      .
SFX 230    0       agan      .
SFX 230    0       agana      .
SFX 230    0       aganaino      .
SFX 230    0       aganantz      .
SFX 230    0       agandik      .
SFX 230    0       agatik      .
SFX 230    0       egi      .
SFX 230    0       egia      .
SFX 230    0       egiak      .
SFX 230    0       egiarekin      .
SFX 230    0       egiarendako/243      .
SFX 230    0       egiarentzat      .
SFX 230    0       egiaren/238      .
SFX 230    0       egiari      .
SFX 230    0       egiaz      .
SFX 230    0       egiei      .
SFX 230    0       egiek      .
SFX 230    0       egiekin      .
SFX 230    0       egiendako/243      .
SFX 230    0       egientzat      .
SFX 230    0       egietako/243      .
SFX 230    0       egietaraino      .
SFX 230    0       egietarantz      .
SFX 230    0       egietarat      .
SFX 230    0       egietara      .
SFX 230    0       egietatik      .
SFX 230    0       egietan      .
SFX 230    0       egietarik      .
SFX 230    0       egiez      .
SFX 230    0       egien/238      .
SFX 230    0       egigatik      .
SFX 230    0       egioi      .
SFX 230    0       egiok      .
SFX 230    0       egiokin      .
SFX 230    0       egiontzat      .
SFX 230    0       egiotaz      .
SFX 230    0       egioz      .
SFX 230    0       egion      .
SFX 230    0       egitzat      .
SFX 230    0       egik      .
SFX 230    0       egitako/243      .
SFX 230    0       egitaraino      .
SFX 230    0       egitarantz      .
SFX 230    0       egitarat      .
SFX 230    0       egitara      .
SFX 230    0       egitatik      .
SFX 230    0       egitan      .
SFX 230    0       egitarik      .
SFX 230    0       egiz      .
SFX 230    0       egirekin      .
SFX 230    0       egirendako/243      .
SFX 230    0       egirentzat      .
SFX 230    0       egiren/238      .
SFX 230    0       egiri      .
SFX 230    0       egirik      .
SFX 230    0       egian      .
SFX 230    0       egiko/243      .
SFX 230    0       egiraino      .
SFX 230    0       egirantz      .
SFX 230    0       egirat      .
SFX 230    0       egira      .
SFX 230    0       egitik      .
SFX 230    0       ei      .
SFX 230    0       ek      .
SFX 230    0       ekin      .
SFX 230    0       ekiko/243      .
SFX 230    0       en/238      .
SFX 230    0       endako/243      .
SFX 230    0       entzat      .
SFX 230    0       entzako/243      .
SFX 230    0       ena      .
SFX 230    0       enak      .
SFX 230    0       enarekin      .
SFX 230    0       enarendako/243      .
SFX 230    0       enarentzat      .
SFX 230    0       enaren/238      .
SFX 230    0       enari      .
SFX 230    0       enaz      .
SFX 230    0       enei      .
SFX 230    0       enek      .
SFX 230    0       enekin      .
SFX 230    0       enendako/243      .
SFX 230    0       enentzat      .
SFX 230    0       enetako/243      .
SFX 230    0       enetaraino      .
SFX 230    0       enetarantz      .
SFX 230    0       enetarat      .
SFX 230    0       enetara      .
SFX 230    0       enetatik      .
SFX 230    0       enetan      .
SFX 230    0       enetarik      .
SFX 230    0       enez      .
SFX 230    0       enen/238      .
SFX 230    0       engatik      .
SFX 230    0       enoi      .
SFX 230    0       enok      .
SFX 230    0       enokin      .
SFX 230    0       enontzat      .
SFX 230    0       enotaz      .
SFX 230    0       enoz      .
SFX 230    0       enon      .
SFX 230    0       eni      .
SFX 230    0       enik      .
SFX 230    0       enean      .
SFX 230    0       eneko/243      .
SFX 230    0       eneraino      .
SFX 230    0       enerantz      .
SFX 230    0       enerat      .
SFX 230    0       enera      .
SFX 230    0       enetik      .
SFX 230    0       etako/243      .
SFX 230    0       etakoa      .
SFX 230    0       etakoago/243      .
SFX 230    0       etakoak      .
SFX 230    0       etakoarekin      .
SFX 230    0       etakoarendako/243      .
SFX 230    0       etakoarentzat      .
SFX 230    0       etakoari      .
SFX 230    0       etakoaz      .
SFX 230    0       etakoegi      .
SFX 230    0       etakoei      .
SFX 230    0       etakoek      .
SFX 230    0       etakoekin      .
SFX 230    0       etakoendako/243      .
SFX 230    0       etakoentzat      .
SFX 230    0       etakoetaraino      .
SFX 230    0       etakoetarantz      .
SFX 230    0       etakoetarat      .
SFX 230    0       etakoetara      .
SFX 230    0       etakoetatik      .
SFX 230    0       etakoetan      .
SFX 230    0       etakoetarik      .
SFX 230    0       etakoez      .
SFX 230    0       etakogatik      .
SFX 230    0       etakooi      .
SFX 230    0       etakook      .
