eu.dic
adineko/230
adingabeko/230
adin-nagusiko/230
adjektibozko/230
ageriko/230
agindupeko/230
aginduzko/230
ahaleko/230
ahozko/230
ahurbiko/230
akaburengo/230
aldameneko/230
aldebiko/230
alderantzizko/230
aldibereko/230
aldiuneko/230
aldizkako/230
alegiazko/230
alfazenbakizko/230
alfer-alferrikako/230
alfer-alferriko/230
alferreko/230
alferrikako/230
alimaleko/230
alturako/230
altzoko/230
amaigabeko/230
amaldeko/230
amebantzeko/230
antiebangeliozko/230
antigoaleko/230
antikatarrozko/230
antikolerazko/230
antz-antzeko/230
antzeko/230
antzerako/230
aparteko/230
apriorizko/230
arartegabeko/230
araubidezko/230
arduragabeko/230
ardurako/230
ardurapeko/230
ardurazko/230
areagoko/230
arestiko/230
argitaragabeko/230
armagabeko/230
arnasbiko/230
arrazazko/230
arrazoizko/230
arteko/230
arteragoko/230
artifiziozko/230
askotariko/230
aspaldidaniko/230
aspaldiko/230
astebarruko/230
atergabeko/230
atzenengo/230
atzeranzko/230
atzeraurreko/230
aukerako/230
aurreneko/230
aurrenengo/230
aurreragoko/230
aurrerako/230
aurrerantzeko/230
aurrerengo/230
aurretikako/230
aurtengo/230
ausazko/230
axaleko/230
axolazko/230
azaleko/230
azaletiko/230
azkeneko/230
azkenengo/230
azkengabeko/230
babesgabeko/230
babespeko/230
badaezpadako/230
baiezkako/230
baiezko/230
baitezpadako/230
bakarkako/230
bakezko/230
bako/230
baldintzapeko/230
baldintzazko/230
baleko/230
baliobiko/230
baliozko/230
balizkako/230
balizko/230
bana-banako/230
banakako/230
banako/230
banan-banako/230
banango/230
barnetikako/230
barregarrizko/230
barrualdeko/230
baterako/230
begibeteko/230
begipeko/230
behargabeko/230
beharrezko/230
behin-behineko/230
behingo/230
bekatuzko/230
beldurgarrizko/230
benetako/230
berbabako/230
berbazko/230
berealdiko/230
berebiziko/230
beregainezko/230
berezgaindiko/230
bergaineko/230
berrizko/230
bertoko/230
besoetako/230
bete-beteko/230
beti-bateko/230
betiko/230
bezalako/230
bidezko/230
bistako/230
bokalarteko/230
borondatezko/230
bukaerako/230
burubiko/230
debaldeko/230
debozioko/230
denborazkanpoko/230
derrigorrezko/230
desgogarako/230
didako/230
diziplinarteko/230
dudako/230
dudazko/230
edonolako/230
edozelako/230
egiantzeko/230
egundainoko/230
eguneko/230
egungo/230
emakumezko/230
erabateko/230
erakusmeneko/230
erdizurdazko/230
erlijiozko/230
errotiko/230
eskolaurreko/230
eskuko/230
espirituzko/230
etengabeko/230
ezelako/230
ezinbestezko/230
ezinezko/230
ezkutuko/230
ezusteko/230
fedegabeko/230
gaineko/230
gainerateko/230
gaitzeko/230
galaxiarteko/230
ganorabako/230
ganorazko/230
garrantzizko/230
gehiegizko/230
geroagoko/230
gerorako/230
geroztiko/230
gezurrezko/230
gizaldeko/230
gizonezko/230
gogarako/230
gogozko/230
goitiko/230
gorengo/230
gurako/230
gutxieneko/230
hainbateko/230
hainbesterainoko/230
halabereko/230
halako/230
haragitako/230
haragizko/230
hartako/230
hauspeko/230
hautuzko/230
heriozko/230
hilarteko/230
hiriarteko/230
hirugarrengo/230
hirurteko/230
hitzezko/230
holako/230
honako/230
honelako/230
honoko/230
horko/230
horrelako/230
horrenbesterainoko/230
hotsandiko/230
hur-hurreko/230
hurreko/230
ikaragarrizko/230
indarrezko/230
inoizko/230
inongo/230
irabazpidezko/230
iraizeko/230
irlarteko/230
irudiko/230
isilkako/230
itxuragabeko/230
itxurazko/230
itzelezko/230
izengabeko/230
izokinantzeko/230
jadaneko/230
jaioaurreko/230
jaseko/230
kanaerdiko/230
klasearteko/230
kolorezko/230
kontsonantearteko/230
kostubidezko/230
larruazalpeko/230
legezko/230
lerroarteko/230
lotsabako/230
lurrazpiko/230
maizko/230
maulazko/230
ministerioarteko/230
molekularteko/230
nazioarteko/230
nondikako/230
noraezeko/230
odoleko/230
ohiturazko/230
ohizko/230
oinezko/230
ordezko/230
ornoarteko/230
osterantzeko/230
pareko/230
popako/230
profesioarteko/230
sakelako/230
sasoiko/230
seihileko/230
sektorearteko/230
silababakarreko/230
soberaniazko/230
susmagabeko/230
txandakako/230
urpeko/230
urrutiko/230
usteko/230
zalantzako/230
zatizko/230
zelularteko/230
zentzugabeko/230
zentzumenezko/230
zernahitarako/230
zintzilikako/230
zorigabeko/230
zorigaiztoko/230
zoritxarreko/230
